Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-32,112
Flood control improvement corridor; building permit; issuance; procedure.

A building permit shall be required for all structures within an adopted flood control improvement corridor if the actual cost of the structure will exceed one thousand dollars.

Upon the filing of a request for a building permit for a structure on a parcel of land located within a flood control improvement corridor, the officer responsible for issuance of building permits shall give the district notice of the filing of the request for a building permit. The officer shall not issue a permit for a period of sixty days from the date of mailing such notice to the district unless the district waives the time period in writing.

Within the sixty-day period, the district may file with the officer and send by certified mail to the landowner a statement of the district's intent to negotiate with the owner of the land involved. Upon the filing and mailing of such a statement of intent, the district shall be allowed six months for negotiations with the landowner.

At the end of the six-month period, if the landowner has not withdrawn the application for a permit, the permit shall be issued if it meets all other applicable codes, ordinances, and laws.

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 19.